Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.270

Contractors—Authority of county to verify registration and report violations.

A county that issues a business license to a person required to be registered under chapter 18.27 RCW may verify that the person is registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and report violations to the department of labor and industries.

[ 2009 c 432 s 4.]

NOTES:

Report—2009 c 432: See RCW 18.27.800.